Oklahoma, session 2025, SB696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 9-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 9-103. The board of education of any school district


authorized to furnish transportation to school children may purchase


and maintain suitable vehicles for such use and/or may contract with


responsible individuals or another school district to furnish all or


part of said such transportation. All such contractors, however,


shall be subject to statutory provisions relating to the


transportation of school children. Every vehicle with a capacity of


ten passengers or more used in transporting school children shall


have painted in letters not less than eight (8) inches in height on



Req. No. 265 Page 1


the front thereof the words, “SCHOOL BUS,” and on the rear thereof


in letters of the same size, “SCHOOL BUS.”


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-265 EB 1/19/2025 5:41:32 AM































Req. No. 265 Page 2